Hawaii statutes.
B. Pacific
International Space Center for

Exploration
Systems

[§201-76] Pacific
international space center for exploration systems. (a) There is
established the Pacific international space center for exploration systems, to
be administratively attached to the office of aerospace development in the
department of business, economic development, and tourism.

(b) The space center may employ, subject to
chapter 76, technical experts and officers, agents, and employees, permanent
and temporary, as required. The space center may also employ officers, agents,
and employees, prescribe their duties and qualifications, and fix their
salaries, without regard to chapter 76, when in the determination of the board,
the services to be performed by those employed are unique and essential to the
execution of the functions of the space center. [L 2012, c 169, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next